Tennessee, session 114, SB1986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-7-108(c), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(1)
(A) If a body is subject to post-mortem examination under this part, then
this part is suspended, except as provided in this subsection (c), to the extent
necessary for the preservation of any body or part of the body, as defined in §
68-30-102, where an anatomical gift of the body or part of the body has been
made in accordance with the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, compiled in title 68,
chapter 30, part 1.
(B) A medical examiner may deny the procurement of an anatomical gift
in whole or in part if the medical examiner reasonably believes that the removal
would:
(i) Compromise the integrity of the forensic investigation;
(ii) Destroy or obscure evidence relevant to determining cause,
manner, or circumstances of death;
(iii) Delay the autopsy unreasonably; or
(iv) Otherwise conflict with the medical examiner's statutory duties
or ethical obligations.
(2)
SB1986
009700
- 1 -

(A) An anatomical gift shall not be procured or removed from the body
prior to a post-mortem examination under this part without express written
authorization from the medical examiner having jurisdiction over the case.
(B) If there is a disagreement between the procurement organization and
the medical examiner regarding such authorization, then the medical examiner's
decision must prevail.
(3) The medical examiner shall consider any request to recover an anatomical
gift made by a federally designated procurement organization operating in this state and
may authorize the recovery of an anatomical gift when, in the examiner's judgment:
(A) The removal will not interfere with the determination of cause and
manner of death;
(B) The anatomical gift to be removed is not directly involved in the
suspected fatal pathology;
(C) Sufficient documentation exists to preserve necessary forensic
evidence prior to removal, which includes photographs and radiographs; and
(D) The removal will not interfere with a solid factual foundation for an
expert opinion.
(4)
(A) The medical examiner may set any reasonable condition prior to the
procurement of an anatomical gift that a procurement organization must adhere
to, including the participation of forensic personnel during the procurement.
(B) The medical examiner may request the procurement organization to
conduct any additional test not normally contemplated for donor screening
purposes.
(5)
- 2 - 009700

(A) Prior to procuring an anatomical gift, the procurement organization
shall provide the medical examiner in possession of the body with the following:
(i) A list of the anatomical gifts to be recovered;
(ii) Anticipated surgical approach and timing; and
(iii) Assurance that the procurement team will comply with any
conditions set by the examiner.
(B) Following procuring the anatomical gift, the procurement organization
shall provide to the medical examiner with jurisdiction over the case the following:
(i) Overall photographs of the front and the back of the body in
addition to closeup images of significant identifiers and injuries;
(ii) Blood and other body fluids taken from the body at the time of
admission to the hospital in order to complete forensic testing;
(iii) Test results from the additional testing conducted by the
procurement organization, if requested by the medical examiner; and
(iv) A copy of any records generated from activities conducted on
the body.
(6) A medical examiner who, in good faith and within the scope of the medical
examiner's professional duties, authorizes, limits, or denies the procurement of an
anatomical gift pursuant to this subsection (c) is immune from civil, criminal, or
administrative liability, including disciplinary action by any licensing board or state
agency, for such decision.
(7) This section does not prevent a medical examiner from conducting a limited
or full autopsy after donation has occurred.
- 3 - 009700

(8) All procurement-related activities must be documented in the autopsy report
or case file, including any photographs, written communications, and surgical
descriptions of any pre-autopsy procedures.
(9) Any physician, surgeon, undertaker, law enforcement officer, hospital,
hospital personnel, or other person who acts in good faith in compliance with this
subsection (c) for the purposes established is immune from civil or criminal liability for
removing, transplanting, or otherwise preserving such body or part of a body.
(10) This subsection (c) shall govern and supersede any conflicting provisions of
law.
(11) The chief medical examiner of the state and the organ procurement
agencies serving the state shall develop a protocol for those instances in which this
subsection (c) applies. The protocol must be filed with the department of health and
must be reviewed and updated as necessary.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-30-108(a), is amended by
deleting the first sentence and substituting:
Except as otherwise provided in this part and in § 38-7-108, in the absence of an
express, contrary indication by the donor, a person other than the donor is barred from
making, amending, or revoking an anatomical gift of a donor's body.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 009700